Türkçe
Digitoy Games
Gizlilik Politikası
Son Güncellenme Tarihi: 20 Kasım 2024
Digitoy İnteraktif Teknolojileri Bilişim Yazılım Ticaret Limited Şirketi (“
Digitoy
”) kişisel verilerinizin korunmasına önem vermektedir. Digitoy ve bağlı şirketleri, vekilleri, danışmanları, çalışanları, yöneticileri ve müdürleri topluca “
Digitoy Games
” ve “
biz
” olarak anılacaktır. İşbu gizlilik politikası ve ilgili Kişisel Verilerin Korunması Aydınlatma Metinleri (hepsi birlikte “Gizlilik Politikası” olarak anılacaktır) aracılığıyla kişisel verilerinizi işlediğimiz faaliyetler hakkında sizlere bilgi sağlamaktayız.
Digitoy Games çeşitli çevrimiçi ve mobil oyunlar sunmaktadır. Gizlilik Politikamız,
https://www.digitoygames.com
adresinde ve/veya Digitoy Games tarafından işletilen diğer alan adlarında, mobil uygulamalarda veya web sitelerinde (“
Platformlar
”) sunduğumuz oyunlarımız, ürünlerimiz, hizmetlerimiz veya içeriklerimiz gibi hizmetlerimizi (“
Hizmetler
”) kullandığınız her zaman geçerlidir. Bu Gizlilik Politikası, verilerinizi işleme yöntemlerimizi ve AB Genel Veri Koruma Tüzüğü (“
GDPR
”), 6698 sayılı Kişisel Verilerin Korunması Kanunu (“
KVKK
”) ve ilgili mevzuat uyarınca bu kişisel verilerinizle ilgili haklarınızı ve tercihlerinizi açıklar. Lütfen Digitoy Games'in üçüncü tarafların eylemlerinden, sitelerinin içeriğinden, kendilerine sağladığınız bilgilerin kullanımından veya sunabilecekleri herhangi bir hizmetten sorumlu olmadığını unutmayın.
Digitoy Games'in mevcut olduğu belirli ülkeler ve/veya bölgeler için veri koruma uygulamaları ve aydınlatma metinleri (“
Kişisel Verilerin Korunması Aydınlatma Metinleri
”) aşağıdaki gibidir:
Avrupa Birliği için lütfen aşağıdaki
“
Digitoy Games GDPR Privacy Notice for the Users
”
metnini kontrol edin.
Türkiye için lütfen aşağıdaki
“
Digitoy Games Kişisel Verilerinin Korunmasına İlişkin Kullanıcı Aydınlatma Metni
”
ni kontrol edin.
Bu Gizlilik Politikası'nı veya Kullanım Şartları'nı kabul etmiyorsanız lütfen Hizmetleri yüklemeyin veya kullanmayın.
Digitoy Games, bu Gizlilik Politikası'nı ve/veya Kişisel Verilerin Korunması Aydınlatma Metinleri’ni değiştirme hakkını saklı tutar. Hizmetleri kullanmaya devam etmeniz, bu Gizlilik Politikası'ndaki değişiklikleri kabul ettiğiniz anlamına gelir. Gizlilik Politikamız veya uygulamalarımızla ilgili sorularınız, yorumlarınız veya endişeleriniz varsa lütfen
Bize Ulaşın.
Kişisel Verilerinizin Güvenliği
Verilerinizi korumak için azami özeni gösteriyoruz ve bu bağlamda gerekli tüm önlemleri alıyoruz.
Aldığımız önlemler kişisel verilerinizin niteliğine göre değişmektedir.
Digitoy Games hesabınızın güvenliği için, şifrenizin güçlü olmasını ve şifrenizi kimseyle paylaşmamanızı öneririz. Hizmetlerimizi kullanmayı bitirdiğinizde Digitoy Games hesabınızdan ve Hizmetlerimize erişmek için kullandığınız sosyal ağ hesabınızdan çıkış yapmanızı öneririz. Digitoy Games hesabınızın güvenliğini korumanızı ve hesabınıza yetkisiz erişim olduğunu fark ederseniz derhal bize bildirmenizi rica ederiz.
Hizmetlerimizin, müşteri veri tabanımızın ve kayıtlarımızın olası güvenlik ihlallerine karşı önlemler almış olsak bile, Platformlarımızda yetkisiz erişim, bilgisayar korsanlığı faaliyetleri ve diğer veri kaybı veya veri ihlallerinin asla gerçekleşmeyeceğini garanti edemeyiz. Yapılan tüm iletimler kendi riskiniz altındadır. Web sitelerimizin güvenliğiyle ilgili herhangi bir sorunuz varsa lütfen
Bize Ulaşın.
AVRUPA BİRLİĞİ
Digitoy Games
Privacy Policy
Last Updated: 20 November 2024
Digitoy İnteraktif Teknolojileri Bilişim Yazılım Ticaret Limited Şirketi (“
Digitoy
”) attaches importance to the protection of your personal data. Digitoy and its affiliates, their proxies, consultants, employees, managers and directors shall be collectively referred to as “
Digitoy
            Games
” and “
we(s)
”. We provide you with information about the activities in which we
            process your personal data through this privacy policy and relevant Personal Data Protection
            Statements
            (all together referred to as “
Privacy Policy
”).
Digitoy Games offers a variety of online and mobile games. Our Privacy Policy applies whenever you
            use
            our services such as our games, products, services or contents (“Services”) that we provide on
https://www.digitoygames.com
, and/or
            other
            domains, mobile applications or websites operated by Digitoy Games (“
Platforms
”). This
            Privacy
            Policy describes the ways we use your data and your rights and choices concerning that personal data
            of
            yours in accordance with EU General Data Protection Regulation (“
GDPR
”), Turkish Law No. 6698
            on
            the Protection of Personal Data (“
KVKK
”) and related legislation. Please note that Digitoy
            Games
            is not responsible for the actions of third parties, the content of their sites, the use of
            information
            you provide to them or any services they may offer.
Data protection practices and statements for specific countries and/or regions where Digitoy Games is
            available (“
Personal Data Protection Statements
”) are as follows:
For European Union, please check
“
Digitoy Games GDPR
               Privacy
               Notice for the Users
”
below.
For Türkiye, please check
“
Digitoy Games Kişisel
               Verilerinin
               Korunmasına İlişkin Kullanıcı Aydınlatma Metni
”
below.
Please do not install or use the Services if you do not agree to this Privacy Policy or Terms of
            Services.
Digitoy Games reserves the right to modify this Privacy Policy and/or Personal Data Protection
            Statements. Your continued use of the Services shall mean your acceptance of the changes to this
            Privacy
            Policy. If you have questions, comments, or concerns regarding our Privacy Policy or practices,
            please
Contact Us
.
Security of Your Personal Data
We take utmost care to protect your data and take all necessary measures in this context.
The measures we take vary according to the nature of your personal data.
For the security of your Digitoy Games account, we recommend that your password is strong and that
            you do
            not share your password with anyone. We recommend that you log out of your Digitoy Games account and
            the
            social network account you use to access our Services when you are finished using them. We encourage
            you
            to maintain the security of your Digitoy Games account and notify us immediately if you discover any
            unauthorized access to your account.
Even if we have taken precautions against possible security breaches of our Services, customer
            database
            and records, we cannot guarantee that unauthorized access, hacking activities and other data loss or
            data breaches will never occur on our Platforms. All transmissions made are at your own risk. If you
            have any questions about the security of our websites, please
Contact Us
.
EUROPEAN UNION
Digitoy Games
GDPR Privacy Notice for the Users
Effective
20 November, 2024
Last Amended
20 November, 2024
This Digitoy Games GDPR Privacy Notice for the Users ("
Privacy Notice
") applies when you use our Services (
described below
) and forms an integral part of Digitoy’s
Terms of Service
. Please read it before using Digitoy Games’ Services. This document is a privacy notice and provides information about how we collect, store, use, and disclose your personal data when providing these Services to you.
I. Categories of Personal Data We Collect and How We Collect It
When you visit our Platforms or use our Services, we process your personal data in the categories below. We collect your personal data through your account and/or player profile that you have created to use our Services.
A. Data About You That You Share with Us Directly
When you use our Services, you may share your data with us directly.
Some games or parts of our Services may use a more traditional registration or account set-up process where you may be asked to share the following data with us:
your first and last name;
your username;
your gender;
your age or birthday;
your e-mail address;
a password; and/or
other data that helps us make sure it’s you accessing your account or helps us improve our services.
We may also let you create a player profile that other Digitoy Games players can see. Your player profile may include the following data:
your profile photo;
your age or age range;
the approximate physical location data that you provide;
links to your profiles on various social networks;
details about the games you play; and/or
a Digitoy Games player ID that is created by Digitoy Games and used to identify your game account (on digitoygames.com, your Digitoy Games player ID will appear in the URL of your profile page).
data about your contacts (if you share).
**Please make sure that there are no special categories of personal data (your race, ethnic origin, political opinion, philosophical belief, religion, sect or other beliefs, appearance and dress, association, foundation or trade union memberships, health, sexual life, criminal conviction and information on security measures against you) among the data you have submitted. We kindly ask you not to share any personal data that you do not prefer to be processed.**
B. Contacts Data You Share About Other Persons or Other Persons Share About You
You may invite people you know to use our Services, including by transferring your contacts to our Platforms or manually entering their contact details so that you can locate your contacts using Digitoy Games Services and invite them to join you in our games or other aspects of our Services.
We remind you that before you share this personal data with us, you must obtain the consent of the data subjects for such sharing. You are solely responsible for getting your contacts’ permission before you give their contact details to us. We may also get information about you from other Digitoy Games users importing or entering their contacts. We use and may store this contact information to help you and your contacts connect through our Services. If you want to remove your contacts stored by us, follow any instructions provided in the Service to request that we remove them from our systems or
Contact Us.
C. Data You Generate Using Our Services
When you use our Services, we’ll collect data about the ways in which you use and interact with our Services, such as when and for how long you play our games, game features and other players you interact with, purchases you make, progress or levels you achieve, and other gameplay activities.
If you choose to use communication features in Digitoy Games Services that allow you to communicate or share data with other players, then we’ll collect data on what is communicated or shared. This includes:
your participation in player forums and message boards;
your public posts or comments on other players’ profiles or gameboards;
your non-public messages or invitations to other players, made either directly on our websites or through in-game mechanisms;
your chats with other players (whether by instant message, live chat, or video); and/or your posted photos, drawings, or other user-generated content.
D. Payment Data
We’ll collect data related to any purchases you make.
If you purchase in-game virtual currency or items in a game you play on digitoygames.com, our third-party payment processor will collect the billing and financial data it needs to process your charges. This may include your personal, contact and financial data. Payment service providers do not share your financial data with Digitoy Games, including your bank or credit card details, but they may share your name, billing address and non-financial data about the items you purchased.
When you play Digitoy Games’ games or access any of our other Services on connected third-party applications or platforms (like Facebook, Apple, Google, or Amazon), any purchases you make will be processed by that third-party application and subject to that third-party application’s terms of service and privacy policy. For these purchases, Digitoy Games does not receive your financial information, but may receive non-financial information related to your purchases, like your name, approximate physical location, and the items purchased. The information Digitoy Games receives depends on the Digitoy Games’ game you’re playing and the third-party application. Please note that purchases of third-party credits or currencies are also subject to those parties’ terms of service and privacy policies.
E. Customer Support Correspondence
We’ll keep a record of any correspondence between us.
When you ask for help from our Customer Support team, we will collect and store the contact data you give them (generally, your name and e-mail address), data about your game play or activity on our Services, and your Digitoy Games player and/or social network ID number. We will also store the communications you have with our Customer Service team and any additional data in those communications in order to provide support and improve the Services.
F. Data About You That We Get from Connected Third-Party Applications, Including Social Networks
Your personal data will be collected if you access our Services through your accounts on third-party websites and applications, including social networks, or if you choose to link your accounts with these companies to our games.
Digitoy Games may collect and store some or all of the following data from the provider of the connected third-party application:
your first and last name;
your profile picture or its URL;
your user identification number (like your Facebook ID number), which may be linked to publicly-available data like your name and profile photo;
your friends’ user ID numbers and other public data;
the e-mail address you provided to that third-party application;
your approximate physical location and that of the devices you use to access our Services;
your gender;
your birthday, age, and/or age range;
data about your activities on or through the connected third-party application;
other publicly-available data on the third-party application; and/or
any other data that you or the provider of the third-party application share with Digitoy Games.
If you access our Services from a third-party application or connect our Services to a third-party
            application, you should also read that third-party application’s terms of service and privacy policy.
If you are unclear about what information a third-party application is sharing with us, please go to the
            third-party application to find out more about their privacy practices.
The data shared depends on the Digitoy Games' game that you are playing, the third-party
            application/platform you connect with our Platforms and the terms of service and privacy policy therein,
            your privacy settings, and your friends’ privacy settings, if any, on that third-party application. You
            can
            find detailed information about what data third parties’ applications/platforms share with us through
            their
            privacy policies in the links below:
Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/center
Apple:
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/
Google:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Amazon:
https:www.aws.amazon.com/tr/privacy
G. Cookies and Other Automated Data Collection
We’ll collect information about your device and how you use our Services, including using cookies.
We use cookies and other similar technologies (e.g., beacons, pixel tags, clear gifs, and device identifiers) to recognize you and/or your device(s) on, off, and across different Services and devices.
            We
            also allow others to use cookies and similar technologies as described in our Cookie Notice. You can
            control
            or opt out of the use of cookies and similar technologies that track your behavior on the sites of
            others
            for third-party advertising, as described in our Cookie Notice.
We, our service providers, and our business partners use these cookies and other similar technologies to
            collect and analyze certain kinds of technical information, including:
IP address;
the type of computer or mobile device you are using;
platform type (like Apple iOS or Android);
your operating system version;
your mobile device’s identifiers, like your MAC Address, Apple Identifier For Advertising (IDFA),
               and/or
               Android Advertising ID (AAID);
application performance and de-bugging information;
your browser type and language;
referring and exit pages, and URLs;
the number of clicks on an app feature or web page;
the amount of time spent on an app feature or web page;
domain names;
landing pages;
pages viewed and the order of those pages; and/or
game state and the date and time of activity on our Services.
In some cases, we will connect the above information with your social network ID or Digitoy Games
            user
            ID.
If you play Digitoy Games’ games from a mobile device, we additionally collect the following data:
the name you have associated with your device;
your country;
your telephone number (if you provide it);
your specific geolocation (with your permission);
your mobile contacts (with your permission);
data about the Digitoy games and other third-party apps you have on your device.
H. Other Sources
To enable advertisers, ad networks and bid wall providers to serve you adverts that are more relevant to your interests, they may collect the following personal data from you using cookies and other similar tracking technologies and may use a single tracking technology or multiple tracking technologies at the same time:
performance data (such as the total number of clicks an advert receives);
certain technical data (IP address, non-permanent device identifier such as IDFA and de-identified permanent device identifier such as scrambled Android ID);
unique identifiers, such as your social network ID or Digitoy Games player ID; and/or other contextual data about your game (such as your level and session length).
II. How We Use Data We Collect and Our Legal Basis for Processing
We process your personal data for the following purposes:
to improve and optimize our Services and our players’ experiences;
to create your game accounts and allow you to play our games;
to identify and suggest connections with other Digitoy Games players and personalize our Services to you;
to communicate with you about in-game updates, and changes we make to our policies;
to enable players to communicate with each other;
to provide technical support and respond to player inquiries;
to protect the safety and well-being of our players;
to protect Digitoy’s rights and property in connection with our Services;
to prevent fraud or potentially illegal activities;
to manage and deliver contextual and behavioral advertising;
to comply with our legal obligations, resolve any disputes we may have with you or other players, and to enforce our agreements with third parties; and/or
to conduct research to improve the quality of the Services provided to you.
When we process your personal data in order to serve adverts, we rely on the following purposes:
to measure how effective the adverts are;
to deliver targeted advertising (when our Services are on and off) by displaying advertisements for products and services that are more relevant to you (this practice is known as interest-based advertising or behavioral advertising) in order to personalize your experience; and/or
to obtain web statistics, which analyze site traffic and other player activity in order to improve your experience.
We process your personal data to perform our contractual obligations; to provide you with appropriate advertising in our legitimate interests, to improve and personalize our Services; to fulfill our legal obligations and to exercise or establish our rights.
If you have any further questions about the purpose for which we collect your personal data and the legal basis for our use, or if you require any further data, please
Contact Us.
III. How We Share Data
We’ll share your data with third parties when you use our Services under the circumstances described in this section.
A. Friends and Other Digitoy Games Players
Digitoy Games’ games and Services support and often encourage you to interact with other players. In most Digitoy Games’ games, if you play through a social network or connect to a social network (for example, Facebook), your social network friends who also play a Digitoy Games’ game will see your name, photo, player profile, and a description of your activities for the game (including any Digitoy Games’ game you have played).
In addition, in many Digitoy Games’ games, other players, regardless of whether they are your social network friends, will be able to see your player profile and the identifying data in your profile (as defined above) and view descriptions of your in-game activities; communicate with you within our Services; and send you game requests or friend requests through our Services or the related social network. For example, in Okey Extra, when you are playing at a table, all the other players at the same table can see your player profile and send you an in-game chat message.
B. Third-Party Advertising Including Behavioral Advertising and Analytics
We share your personal data with advertisers based on your consent in order to tailor the advertisements you see while using our Services to your interests and to allow us to offer you some of our Services free of charge. These advertisements may include, without limitation, banner ads on game boards or Services themselves, as full-screen or in part ads, between actions or games. These third-party advertisements and advertising content are served by third-party advertisers and not by Digitoy Games, or through an “offer wall” in which third-party advertisers offer to provide virtual currency or other in-game items to players in exchange for watching an advertisement or for completing a task, such as signing up for an account with one of the advertisers, completing a survey, or finishing a particular game level. Offer walls are hosted by third-party offer wall providers, and the offers are made by third-party advertisers, not by Digitoy Games.
We do not actively share personal information that directly identifies you with third-party advertisers for their direct marketing purposes unless you give us your consent.
To enable advertisers, ad networks, and offer wall providers to serve you with more relevant ads, they may collect, or we may collect and share with them, the following types of information when you use our Services:
performance data (like the number of clicks on an advertisement);
certain technical information (like IP address, non-persistent device identifier such as IDFA, and de-identified persistent device identifier such as a hashed Android ID);
a unique identifier, such as your social network ID or Digitoy Games player ID; and/or
other contextual data about your game play (like your level and session length).
In addition to serving you with relevant ads, the information collected may be used to:
measure how effective ads are;
offer you targeted advertising (both on and off our Services) in order to personalize your experience by showing you advertisements for products and services that are more likely to appeal to you (a practice known as interest-based advertising or behavioral advertising); and/or
undertake web analytics to analyze traffic and other player activity to improve your experience.
Advertisers or ad networks may collect this information through the use of cookies and other similar tracking technologies, and they may use a single tracking technology or multiple tracking technologies at the same time.
Please note, after clicking on a third-party advertisement or offer, you may no longer be on a site or app controlled by Digitoy or the social network through which you are playing Digitoy’s games.
We would like to remind you that the actions of third parties that advertise through our Services are subject to the privacy policies of those companies.
C. Safety, Security, and Compliance with Law
We’ll share your data if necessary for safety, security, or compliance with the applicable law.
Digitoy Games may share your personal data with authorized public institutions and organizations in the following cases:
to satisfy any laws or regulations that are applicable and in force;
when we have a good faith belief that we have to disclose the data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including for national security, law enforcement, or legal process purposes (for example, a court order, search warrant, or subpoena);
when we believe in our sole discretion that our Services are being used in committing a crime, including to report such criminal activity or to share data with other companies and organizations for the purposes of fraud protection, credit risk reduction, and other security precautions;
when we have a good faith belief that there is an emergency that poses a threat to the health and/or safety of you, another person, or the public generally;
and/or to protect the rights or property of Digitoy Games’ or applicable third parties.
Including to enforce Digitoy
Terms of Service.
D. Third-Party Service Providers
We’ll share your data with the third-party service providers and business partners that we work with to bring you, our Services.
We will share your data with third-party companies who perform services on our behalf, like payment processing, analytics, analysis, hosting services, customer service, marketing, and advertising optimization. We will also share your data with our third-party business partners who assist us in delivering and optimizing our Services, such as our platform partners
(Apple, Google, Facebook, Amazon, etc.)
. Where we share your data with third-party service providers and business partners, we ensure that we have appropriate agreements in place to protect your data
(as required by applicable data protection laws)
.
IV. Your Rights and How to Access, Update, and Manage Your Personal Data
A. European Countries Users' Rights
If you are a user located in a member state of the European Union, you have the following data
            protection
            rights in relation to your personal data in accordance with Articles 15-22 of the GDPR:
You can
access
or request
deletion
of your personal data by submitting a request via mailing to us from
info@digitoygames.com
.
You can
correct
or
update
your personal data,
object to processing
of your personal data, ask us to
restrict processing
of your personal data, or request
portability
of your personal data.
You can
opt-out of marketing communications
(if any)
.
If we have collected and processed your personal data with your consent, then you can
withdraw your consent
at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal data conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
You have the
right to complain to a data protection authority
about our collection and use of your personal data. For more data, please contact your local data protection authority. For more, please contact your local data protection authority.
As a data subject, please contact us via
info@digitoygames.com
to exercise your above-mentioned rights. If you have any problems with Digitoy Games’ games or would like to exercise any of your other rights, you can
Contact Us
. We respond to all applications you make to us in accordance with the applicable data protection laws in accordance with the legislation.
Accessing and Deleting Personal Information Held by Digitoy Games
You can request a copy of or deletion of your game account by sending an e-mail to
info@digitoygames.com
.
To review and update personal data associated with your Digitoy Games player profile in certain games,
            visit
            the “settings” page in that game.
If you want to review or delete personal information associated with your game account data, please send
            us
            an e-mail to
info@digitoygames.com
.
In case of requests for deletion of your personal data:
We will take reasonable
            measures to
            delete your personal data from our records. We will keep certain records
(e.g., personal data relating to payments or customer service matters)
where we need
(and have rights)
to, such as for legal or accounting purposes. We’ll also keep data in order
            to
            exercise, defend, or establish our rights.
B. Managing Personal Data, We Receive from Third-Party Applications / Platforms and From Your Mobile
            Device
To manage the data, we receive from third-party applications or platforms and from your mobile device,
            please
            use the tools and settings provided by the third-party application and your mobile device.
To manage the data Digitoy Games receives about you from a third-party application or platform where you
            play our games, like Facebook, Apple, Google, or Amazon, you will need to follow the third-party
            application’s instructions for updating your data and changing your privacy settings. The privacy
            management
            tools for applications on Facebook can be found on Facebook settings section.
You also can manage many aspects of data collection and use from your mobile device by visiting the
            “settings” page of your mobile device or web browser and reviewing the access permissions of each
            Digitoy
            Games game / application.
To the extent that one of our games is collecting data about non-Digitoy Games applications you have on
            your
            mobile device, the game will provide you with an option to stop making that data available to us in the
            game’s “settings” page.
Once Digitoy Games receives your data from a third-party application / platform or your mobile device,
            that
            data is stored and used by Digitoy Games in accordance with this Privacy Notice. You may access and
            update
            that data as described above.
C. Opting Out of Third-Party Behavioral Advertising
You can opt out of third-party behavioral advertising through your device settings and other third-party
            opt-out tools.
If you are interested in more data about behavioral advertising and your choices to prevent behavioral
            web
            and mobile web advertising from third parties, you may visit the following websites:
For behavioral advertising from the US:
Network Advertising Initiative Web
                  Page
or
Digital Advertising
                  Partnership
                  Web Page
For behavioral advertising from the EU:
Online Choices Web Page
If you do not want to receive behavioral in-application advertisements from third parties that relate to your interests on your mobile device, you may adjust the ad tracking settings on your device (such as turning on “Limit Ad Tracking”). You can also reset the “Advertising Identifier” (such as an IDFA) from your mobile device’s settings page, which will prevent continued use of existing behavioral data tied to your previous “Advertising Identifier.” Further, depending on the platform provider (such as Apple or Google), you may be able to download apps, such as the Digital Advertising Alliance’s “AppChoices” app, that offer to provide you with control regarding the collection and use of cross-app data for behavioral advertising.
All of the opt-out tools described in this subsection are provided by third parties, not by Digitoy Games. Digitoy Games does not control or operate these tools or the choices that advertisers and others provide through these tools.
Please note that you may still receive third-party advertisements in Digitoy Games Services after using these opt-out tools, but the advertising you see may be less relevant to your interests.
V. Privacy Policies of Linked Third-Party Services and Advertisers
We aren’t responsible for the ways in which third parties use your data (other than our service providers acting under our instructions).
Our websites and games may contain advertisements from “Third-Party Services,” meaning companies other than Digitoy Games, that may link to their own websites, online services, or mobile applications. We are not responsible for the privacy practices or the content of these Third-Party Services. If you have any questions about how these Third-Party Services use your data, you should review their policies and contact them directly.
Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/center
Apple:
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy
VI. Our Policies Concerning Children
We seek to ensure that we do not collect data from children.
Generally speaking, most of our Services are not intended for children under the age of 13 (or under 16 for children located in the European Countries) (collectively, “Children”). Children are not permitted to use these Services, and we do not knowingly collect any personal data from Children.
Though our Services do not target Children as the primary audience, we may collect age information before
            allowing a user to proceed for certain Services. For users who identify themselves as Children in our age-gate on such Services, if we allow Children to use the Services, we will either provide a version of that Service that does not collect, use, or disclose personal data, except as permitted by applicable laws, or obtain legally valid parental consent.
If we learn that we have inadvertently gathered personal information that is not subject to an exception from a Child, we will take reasonable measures to promptly remove that information from our records.
VII. International Operations and Transfers Out of European Union Countries
We may store or process your personal data outside of the country where we collect the information or the country in which you reside. We store personal data about players and visitors to our sites on Amazon Web Services (AWS) servers located in Frankfurt, Germany. Our primary place of business is in Türkiye. You should understand that we may transfer some or all of your personal data to Türkiye in order to carry out certain operational and processing needs as described in this Notice. When we transfer, store, and use personal information collected in the European Union Countries outside of the European Union Countries, we comply with our legal obligations and ensure that your personal data is subject to suitable safeguards or transferred to “approved” territories. Thus, when transferring personal data out of European Union, we implement technical, organizational, and physical safeguards to protect your personal data. We use European Commission approved standard contractual clauses and implement related measures where required by applicable law.
As part of our international operations, we may transfer personal data to our “Affiliated Entities,”
            which
            are any other corporate entities under common ownership with Digitoy or to our business partners and
            service
            providers from time to time for our legitimate business purposes. For example, Digitoy provides certain
            services to its Affiliated Entities.
The data we hold may also be processed by employees operating outside of the European Countries who work
            for
            us, one of our Affiliated Entities, or one of our business partners or service providers. This staff may
            be
            engaged in, among other things, (i) the processing of transactions and your payment details, or (ii) the
            provision of support services. When we transfer your personal data internationally, we will take
            reasonable
            steps to ensure that your personal data is treated securely, lawfully, and in the manner we describe
            here.
            Please note that laws vary from jurisdiction to jurisdiction, so the privacy laws applicable to the
            places
            where your data is transferred to or stored, used, or processed in, may be different from the privacy
            laws
            applicable to the place where you are resident.
If you have questions related to the relevant transfer mechanism for your personal data, please
Contact Us
.
VIII. How Long We Keep Your Personal Data
We destroy your personal data when the purpose of processing ceases to exist and the mandatory retention
            periods specified under the Laws and other relevant legislation expire.
While we keep your data, we take utmost care to protect your data and take all necessary measures in
            this
            context including data minimization processes. The measures we take vary according to the nature of your
            personal data. You can always reach us for deletion of your personal data.
After receiving your request to delete your account, we will destroy your data in accordance with your
            request, unless we have a valid legal reason to process your personal data.
IX. Changes to Our Privacy Notice
We’ll let you know about any material changes to this Privacy Notice.
If we decide to make material changes to our Privacy Notice, we will tell you and other players by
            placing a
            notice in-game or
https://www.digitoygames.com
or by sending you a
            notice to the e-mail address we have on file for you before the change becomes effective (and we will
            ask
            for your consent where required by law). We may supplement this process by placing notices on game
            blogs,
            social network pages, and/or player forums. You should periodically check
https://www.digitoygames.com
and this Privacy Notice for updates.
X. Contact Us
You can contact us with your questions, comments, or concerns.
If you have any questions, comments, or concerns regarding our Privacy Notice and/or privacy practices,
            please send an e-mail to info@digitoygames.com. For all other matters, please contact Digitoy through
            our
            mail,
info@digitoygames.com
or by physical mail to Digitoy
            Games,
            İYTE Teknopark A9 Binası No:14, İzmir/TÜRKİYE.
TÜRKİYE
Digitoy Games
Kişisel Verilerin Korunmasına İlişkin KVKK Kullanıcı Aydınlatma Metni
Yürürlük Tarihi: 20 Kasım 2024
Son Güncelleme: 20 Kasım 2024
İşbu Digitoy Games Kişisel Verilerin Korunmasına İlişkin KVKK Kullanıcı Aydınlatma Metni ("
Aydınlatma
            Metni
"), 6698 sayılı Kişisel Verilerin Korunması Kanunu’nun 10. maddesi ile Aydınlatma
            Yükümlülüğünün
            Yerine Getirilmesinde Uyulacak Usul ve Esaslar Hakkında Tebliğ kapsamında veri sorumlusu sıfatıyla
            Digitoy
            İnteraktif Teknolojileri Bilişim Yazılım Ticaret Limited Şirketi tarafından hazırlanmıştır ve
            Hizmetlerimizi
            (aşağıda açıklanmıştır) kullandığınızda geçerli olup Digitoy Kullanım Şartları’nın da ayrılmaz bir
            parçasıdır.
Lütfen Digitoy Games Hizmetlerini kullanmadan önce bu Aydınlatma Metni’ni okuyun. Bu belge veri
            sorumlusunun
            aydınlatma yükümlülüğünün yerine getirilmesi amacıyla hazırlanmış bir metindir ve bu Hizmetleri size
            sağlarken kişisel verilerinizi nasıl topladığımız, sakladığımız, kullandığımız ve aktardığımız hakkında
            bilgi sağlar.
I. Veri Sorumlusu
6698 sayılı Kişisel Verilerin Korunması Kanunu (“
KVKK
”) uyarınca, kişisel verileriniz veri
            sorumlusu
            olarak Digitoy İnteraktif Teknolojileri Bilişim Yazılım Tic. Ltd. Şti. (“
Şirket
” veya
            “
Digitoy
”)
            tarafından aşağıda açıklanan kapsamda işlenebilecektir.
II. Kişisel Verilerin Toplanması ve Kişisel Veri Kategorileri
Platformlarımızı ziyaret ettiğinizde veya Hizmetlerimizi kullandığınızda, kişisel verilerinizi aşağıdaki
            kategorilerde işlemekteyiz. Kişisel verilerinizi Hizmetlerimizi kullanmak için oluşturduğunuz hesabınız
            ve/veya oyuncu profiliniz aracılığı ile toplamaktayız.
Kişisel Veri Kategorileri
Kişisel Veri Örneği
Sosyal Medya Verileri
Kullanıcı tarafından Hizmetlere erişilebilmesi için giriş yapılan üçüncü parti sosyal medya
                     hesabı profilinden kullanıcının paylaşmaya onay verdiği veya kamuya açık diğer kişisel
                     veriler
Kimlik Verileri
Ad, soyad, doğum tarihi veya yaşı, cinsiyet
İşlem Bilgisi Verileri
Satın alınan oyun içi ürün bilgisi, ödeme işlem kimliği (“payment transaction ID”)
İşlem Güvenliği Verileri
Kullanıcının IP adresi, internet sitesi giriş-çıkış bilgileri, şifre ve parola bilgileri,
                     anlık
                     fotoğraf, işlem dekontları, ikametgâh adresi, internet sağlayıcısı, kullandığı işletim
                     sistemi
                     ve tarayıcı, cihaz tipi (diz üstü bilgisayar ya da akıllı telefon), mobil uygulama ya da web
                     sitesi, cihaz çerez ayarları
Ülke Verileri
Kullanıcı cihazı tarafından bildirilen yaklaşık coğrafi bölge
Görsel ve İşitsel Veriler
Kullanıcının profil fotoğrafı
Müşteri İşlem Verileri
Oyun içi kimlik numarası, kullanıcı hesap bilgileri, çağrı belgesi kayıtları, oyun içi
                     yazışma/iletişim geçmişi verileri
Talep Şikâyet Verileri
Kullanıcıların ilettikleri talep ve şikayetlerde yer alan veriler
**Lütfen iletmiş olduğunuz özgeçmişinizde özel nitelikli kişisel verilerin (ırkınız, etnik kökeniniz,
               siyasi düşünceniz, felsefi inancınız, din, mezhep veya diğer inançlarınız, kılık ve kıyafetiniz,
               dernek,
               vakıf ya da sendika üyelikleriniz, sağlığınız, cinsel hayatınız, ceza mahkûmiyetinize ve
               hakkınızdaki
               güvenlik tedbirlerine ilişkin bilgiler) yer almadığından emin olunuz. **
III. Kişisel Verilerin Hangi Amaç ve Hukuki Sebeplerle İşleneceği
Toplanan kişisel verileriniz, Şirket tarafından aşağıda yer verilen amaçlar (“
Amaçlar
”) ve hukuki
            sebeplerle KVKK’nın 5. maddesinde belirtilen kişisel veri işleme şartları dahilinde ve KVKK’nın 4.
            maddesinde belirtilen kişisel verilerin işlenmesine ilişkin genel ilkelerine uygun olarak
            işlenebilecektir.
Kişisel Veri Kategorileri
Veri İşleme Amaçları
Hukuki Sebepler
Sosyal medya verileri, kimlik verileri, işlem bilgisi verileri, işlem güvenliği verileri,
                     ülke
                     verileri, görsel ve işitsel veriler, müşteri işlem verileri
Digitoy oyunlarına giriş sağlanması, oyun hesaplarının oluşturulması ve gerekli tüm
                           iş
                           süreçlerinin gerçekleştirilmesi,
Hizmetlerin ve oyuncuların deneyimlerinin geliştirilmesi ve optimize edilmesi,
Oyunlar kapsamında sunulan ilave hizmet ve ürünlerin sunulması, satın alınmasının
                           sağlanması
                           ve gerekli tüm iş süreçlerinin birimler tarafından yürütülmesi,
Oyunlar kapsamında iletişim panolarından oyuncuların yararlanmasının sağlanması ve
                           bu
                           iletişim panolarının tüm oyun ve platform kurallarına uygun olarak işletilmesinin
                           sağlanması,
Digitoy hizmetleri kapsamında ürün veya hizmetlerin satışları doğrultusunda gerekli
                           muhasebe
                           ve finansal süreçlerin yürütülmesi,
Hizmetler ve ürünlerin satışı sonrası gerekli destek hizmetlerinin sunulması.
Bir sözleşmenin kurulması veya ifasıyla doğrudan doğruya ilgili olması kaydıyla, sözleşmenin
                     taraflarına ait kişisel verilerin işlenmesinin gerekli olması hukuki sebebine dayalı olarak
Sosyal medya verileri, kimlik verileri, işlem bilgisi verileri, işlem güvenliği verileri,
                     ülke
                     verileri, görsel ve işitsel veriler, müşteri işlem verileri
Oyunculara sunulan hizmet kalitesini artırmak adına oyun ve uygulama içi hizmetlerin
                           yerine
                           getirilmesi için analitik bilgilerin saklanması,
Hizmetlerin ve oyuncuların deneyimlerinin geliştirilmesi ve optimize edilmesi,
Muhasebe ve finansal süreçlerin yürütülmesi,
Bilgi teknolojileri ve siber güvenliğe yönelik işlerin yürütülmesi,
Hukuk işlerinin takibi ve yürütülmesi,
Oyunlar kapsamında iletişim panolarından oyuncuların yararlanmasının sağlanması ve
                           bu
                           iletişim panolarının tüm oyun ve platform kurallarına uygun olarak işletilmesinin
                           sağlanması,
Kurumsal iletişim ve müşteri iletişim süreçlerinin yürütülmesi,
Dolandırıcılığı veya potansiyel olarak yasa dışı faaliyetleri engellemek üzere
                           denetim
                           ve
                           etik süreçlerin yürütülmesi,
Kurumsal pazarlama faaliyetlerinin gerçekleştirilmesi,
Bilgi güvenliği süreçleri kapsamında gerekli testlerin ve platform güvenliğinin
                           sağlanmasına
                           yönelik testlerin ve işlemlerin iş birimleri tarafından gerçekleştirilmesi,
Oyuncularımızın güvenliğini ve rahatlığını korumak,
Digitoy ürün ve hizmet içeriklerinin geliştirilmesi ve sunulması,
Digitoy veya ticari ortaklarımız tarafından desteklenen veya yönetilen ödüller,
                           anketler,
                           çekilişler, yarışmalar veya diğer promosyon faaliyetleri ya da etkinlikleri icra
                           etmek.
İlgili kişinin temel hak ve özgürlüklerine zarar vermemek kaydıyla, veri sorumlusunun meşru
                     menfaatleri için veri işlenmesinin zorunlu olması hukuki sebebine dayalı olarak.
Sosyal medya verileri, kimlik verileri, işlem bilgisi verileri, işlem güvenliği verileri,
                     ülke
                     verileri, görsel ve işitsel veriler, müşteri işlem verileri, talep şikayet verileri
İleride çıkabilecek uyuşmazlıklar için kişisel verilerin kanuni sürelere uygun
                           olarak
                           saklanması,
Dolandırıcılığı veya potansiyel olarak yasa dışı faaliyetleri engellemek,
İlgili kişi başvurularının alınması, yanıtlanması ve gerekli süreçlerin yürütülmesi,
Destek, şikayet, talep ve tüm diğer isteklerinizin alınması, değerlendirilmesi ve
                           sonuçlandırılması,
Kimlik doğrulama gibi bir hakkın yerine getirilmesi için gerekli süreçlerin
                           gerçekleştirilmesi.
Bir hakkın tesisi, kullanılması veya korunması için veri işlemenin zorunlu olması hukuki
                     sebebine
                     dayalı olarak
Sosyal medya verileri, kimlik verileri, işlem bilgisi verileri, işlem güvenliği verileri,
                     ülke
                     verileri, görsel ve işitsel veriler, müşteri işlem verileri, talep şikayet verileri
Dolandırıcılığı veya potansiyel olarak yasa dışı faaliyetleri engellemek,
Gerekli kamu kurum ve kuruluşlara bildirim yükümlülüklerinin yerine getirilmesi,
Kanuni saklama sürelerine uyum sağlanması,
İlgili kişi başvurularının yanıtlanması ve gerekli iş süreçlerinin
                           gerçekleştirilmesi.
Kanunlarda açıkça öngörülmesi ve veri sorumlusunun hukuki yükümlülüğünün yerine
                     getirilebilmesi
                     için
                     zorunlu olması hukuki sebebine dayalı olarak
Sosyal medya verileri, kimlik verileri, işlem bilgisi verileri, işlem güvenliği verileri,
                     görsel
                     ve
                     işitsel veriler
Kayıtlı bir sosyal medya platformu ile (Google, Facebook) giriş yapmayı tercih
                           etmeniz
                           ve
                           rıza vermeniz halinde Digitoy oyun içi profilinizde profil fotoğrafı verilerinizin
                           gösterimi
                           ve cinsiyet bilgisinin profil oluşturma amacıyla işlenmesi ve yalnızca bu amaçlarla
                           ve
                           rızanıza dayalı olarak işlenmesi.
Açık rızanızın olması halinde açık rıza hukuki sebebine dayalı olarak
IV. Kişisel Verilerin Toplanma Yöntemi
Kişisel verileriniz, aşağıda yer verilen Amaçlar’ın yerine getirilmesi kapsamında elektronik ortamda
https://www.digitoygames.com
internet adresi, “Okey Extra” / “101 Okey Extra” / “Tekel Okey” / “Rakkip
            Çanak Okey” / “Can Okey” / “Poker Extra” isimli Digitoy oyunları başta olmak üzere mobil uygulamaları,
            App
            Store ve Google Play Store, internet sitesi ve uygulamalarda kullanılan çerezler, uygulamalara (“
Hizmetler
”)
            Facebook ve Google olmak üzere bir sosyal ağ yolu ile ve/veya üçüncü taraflar aracılığı ile bağlanmanız,
            faydalanmanız, erişim sağlamanız halinde seçim yaptığınız sosyal ağ platformu, e-posta, Şirket içi
            sistemler
            vasıtasıyla KVKK’nın 5. maddesine uygun olarak toplanmaktadır.
Çerezler ve Diğer Tanımlayıcılar
Sizi ve/veya cihazınızı/cihazlarınızı açık, kapalı ve farklı Hizmetler ve cihazlar arasında tanımak için
            çerezler ve diğer benzer teknolojileri (örneğin, işaretçiler, piksel etiketleri, şeffaf gifler ve cihaz
            tanımlayıcıları) kullanmaktayız. Ayrıca, Çerez Aydınlatma Metni’mizde açıklandığı üzere üçüncü kişilerin
            de
            çerezleri ve benzer teknolojileri kullanmasına izin vermekteyiz. Çerez Aydınlatma Metni’mizde
            açıklandığı
            şekilde, üçüncü taraf reklamları için başkalarının sitelerindeki davranışınızı izleyen çerezlerin ve
            benzer
            teknolojilerin kullanımını kontrol edebilir veya devre dışı bırakabilirsiniz.
Biz, hizmet sağlayıcılarımız ve iş ortaklarımız, aşağıdakiler de dahil olmak üzere belirli türde teknik
            bilgileri toplamak ve analiz etmek için bu çerezleri ve diğer benzer teknolojileri kullanmaktayız:
IP adresi;
Kullandığınız bilgisayar veya mobil cihaz türü;
Platform türü (Apple iOS veya Android gibi);
İşletim sistemi sürümünüz;
MAC Adresiniz, Apple Reklam Tanımlayıcısı (IDFA) ve/veya Android Reklam Kimliğiniz (AAID) gibi mobil
               cihazınızın tanımlayıcıları;
Uygulama performansı ve hata ayıklama bilgileri;
Tarayıcınızın türü ve dili;
Yönlendiren ve çıkış sayfaları ve URL'ler;
Uygulama özelliğinde veya web sayfasında tıklama sayısı;
Uygulama özelliğinde veya web sayfasında harcanan zaman miktarı;
Alan adları;
Açılış sayfaları;
Görüntülenen sayfalar ve bu sayfaların sırası ve/veya
Oyun durumu ve Hizmetlerimizdeki etkinliğin tarihi ve saati.
Bazı durumlarda, yukarıdaki bilgileri sosyal ağ kimliğiniz veya Digitoy Games kullanıcı kimliğinizle
            ilişkilendireceğiz.
Digitoy Games oyunlarını bir mobil cihazdan oynuyorsanız, ayrıca aşağıdaki verileri toplarız:
Cihazınızla ilişkilendirdiğiniz ad;
Ülkeniz;
Telefon numaranız (eğer siz sağlarsanız);
Belirli coğrafi konumunuz (izninizle);
Mobil kişileriniz (izninizle);
Cihazınızda bulunan Digitoy oyunları ve diğer üçüncü taraf uygulamalarıyla ilgili veriler.
V. Kişisel Verilerin Saklanması
Kişisel verilerinizi ancak uymakla yükümlü olduğumuz ilgili mevzuatta belirtildiği veya işlendikleri amaç
            için gerekli olan süre kadar muhafaza etmekteyiz.
Ayrıca, veri minimizasyonu çalışmaları yapmakta, kişisel verilerin saklanması için mevzuatta öngörülen
            süreleri tespit etmekte veya mevzuatta öngörülen bir süre olmaması halinde işleme amacına göre azami
            süreyi
            tespit etmekte ve kişisel verileri bu sürenin sona ermesiyle imha etmekteyiz.
Kişisel verilerinizin imha edilmesini istediğinizde iletişim kanallarımızdan bizimle her zaman iletişime
            geçebilirsiniz. Ekibimiz imha talebinizi en kısa sürede yerine getirecektir. Fakat, hukuki
            yükümlülüklerin
            yerine getirilmesi ya da bir hakkın tesisi ve korunması söz konusu ise Digitoy, bu amaçla işlediği
            verileri
            gerekli olan süre kadar saklamaya devam edecektir.
Digitoy’da oluşturduğunuz hesabınızın silinmesine ilişkin talebinizi aldıktan sonra, kişisel verilerinizi
            işlemek için geçerli bir hukuki sebebimiz olmadığı sürece, talebiniz doğrultusunda verilerinizi imha
            edeceğiz.
VI. Kişisel Verilerin Kimlere ve Hangi Amaçla Aktarılabileceği
Yukarıda belirtilen Amaçlar’ın yerine getirilmesi doğrultusunda toplanan kişisel verileriniz; kanunlarda
            açıkça öngörülmesi ve hukuki yükümlülüklerimizin yerine getirilmesi hukuki sebebine dayalı olarak
            kanunen
            yetkili kamu kurumları veya özel kişilere, ilgili kişinin temel hak ve özgürlüklerine zarar vermemek
            kaydıyla veri sorumlusunun meşru menfaatleri için veri işlenmesinin zorunlu olması hukuki sebebine
            dayalı
            olarak hizmet alınan teknik danışmanlar ve tedarikçilerimize ve standart sözleşme imzalanmasına dayalı
            olarak bulut arşivleme hizmeti alınan güvenli Amazon Web Services hizmeti sunucusu Amazon LLC’ye KVKK’nın 5.
            maddesinde belirtilen kişisel veri işleme şartları çerçevesinde KVKK’nın 8. ve 9. maddelerinde
            belirtilen
            kişisel verilerin aktarımına yönelik kurallara uygun olarak aktarılabilecektir.
Digitoy tarafından toplanan verilerin bir kısmı, tarafınıza ait profilin gösterilebilmesi amacıyla diğer
            kullanıcılarla paylaşılabilir. Profilinizde gösterilecek bilgilerin kapsamı ise tarafınızca
            belirlenecektir.
Hizmet sağlayıcımız olan harici web siteleri ve şirketler, kişisel olarak tanımlanabilir bilgilerinize,
            platformlardaki bağlantılar aracılığıyla erişebilirler. Paylaşılan veriler, oynadığınız Digitoy Games
            oyununa, Platformlarımıza bağladığınız üçüncü taraf uygulama/platforma ve bunların hizmet şartları ve
            gizlilik politikasına, gizlilik ayarlarınıza ve varsa arkadaşlarınızın gizlilik ayarlarına bağlıdır. Bu
            web
            siteleri ve şirketler, işbu Aydınlatma Metni kapsamı dışındadır ve işbu Aydınlatma Metni bu web
            sitelerine
            ve şirketlere uygulanamaz. Lütfen ilgili web sitelerinin ve şirketlerin gizlilik politikasına doğrudan
            başvurunuz.
Üçüncü taraf uygulamalarının/platformlarının gizlilik politikaları aracılığıyla bizimle hangi verileri
            paylaştığı hakkında ayrıntılı bilgiyi aşağıdaki bağlantılarda bulabilirsiniz:
Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/center
Apple:
https://www.apple.com/privacy
Google:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Amazon:
https://www.aws.amazon.com/tr/privacy/
VII. Çocuklara İlişkin Kişisel Veriler
18 yaşın altında olan ve reşit olmayanlar, ebeveynlerinin veya vasilerinin izni olmadan, herhangi bir
            ücretli
            Hizmeti sipariş etmemeli veya Hizmetlerimizde çevrimiçi olmamalıdır. 13-17 yaşlarındaki kişilerin,
            herhangi
            bir bilgi almak veya içerik hakkında yorum yapmak istemeleri durumunda, ebeveynlerinin işbu Aydınlatma
            Metni’ni okumalarını ve gerekirse gizlilik yükümlülüğümüzle ilgili bizimle iletişime geçmelerini
            istemelidirler.
Hizmetlerimiz birincil hedef kitle olarak 18 yaş altında olan ve reşit olmayanları hedeflemese de bir
            kullanıcının belirli Hizmetlere devam etmesine izin vermeden önce yaş bilgilerini toplayabiliriz. Henüz
            18
            yaşın altında olan ve reşit olmayanlardan istisnaya tabi olmayan kişisel verileri yanlışlıkla
            topladığımızı
            fark edersek, bu verileri kayıtlarımızdan derhal kaldırmak için makul önlemleri alacağız.
VIII. İlgili Kişilerin Hakları
İlgili Kişinin KVKK’nın 11. Maddesinde Sayılan Hakları
Kişisel verilerinize yönelik olarak KVKK’nın 11. maddesi uyarınca aşağıdaki haklara sahip olduğunuzu
            bildiririz:
Kişisel verilerinizin işlenip işlenmediğini öğrenme,
Kişisel verileriniz işlenmişse, buna ilişkin bilgi talep etme,
Kişisel verilerinizin işlenme amacını ve kişisel verilerinizin işlenme amacına uygun kullanılıp
               kullanılmadığını öğrenme,
Yurt içinde veya yurt dışında kişisel verilerinizin aktarıldığı üçüncü kişileri bilme,
Kişisel verilerinizin eksik veya yanlış işlenmiş olması halinde bunların düzeltilmesini talep
               etme,
İlgili mevzuatta öngörülen şartlar çerçevesinde kişisel verilerinizin silinmesini veya yok edilmesini
               isteme,
İlgili mevzuat uyarınca yapılan düzeltme, silme ve yok edilme işlemlerinin, kişisel verilerinizin
               paylaşıldığı üçüncü kişilere bildirilmesini isteme,
İşlenen kişisel verilerinizin münhasıran otomatik sistemler vasıtasıyla analiz edilmesi suretiyle
               aleyhinize bir sonucun ortaya çıkmasına itiraz etme,
Kişisel verilerinizin kanuna aykırı olarak işlenmesi sebebiyle zarara uğramanız halinde, zararın
               giderilmesini talep etme.
İşbu Aydınlatma Metni’nde belirtilen KVKK’nın 11. maddesinde düzenlenen haklarınıza ilişkin taleplerinizi
            kimliğinizi tespit edecek bilgi ve belgelerle ve aşağıda belirtilen yöntemlerle veya Kişisel Verilerin
            Korunması Kurulu’nun belirlediği diğer yöntemlerle İlgili Kişi Başvuru Formu’nu doldurup imzalayarak
            Şirket’e ücretsiz olarak iletebilirsiniz. Bu konuda kapsamlı düzenleme Veri Sorumlusuna Başvuru Usul ve
            Esasları Hakkında Tebliğ uyarınca yapılmıştır.
Yukarıda sıralanan haklarınıza yönelik başvurularınızı,
https://www.digitoygames.com/kvk/ilgili-kisi-basvuru-formu.pdf
adresinden erişebileceğiniz “İlgili Kişi
            Başvuru Formu”nu doldurarak Şirketimize iletebilirsiniz. Talebinizin niteliğine göre en kısa sürede ve en
            geç
            otuz gün içinde başvurularınız ücretsiz olarak sonuçlandırılacaktır; ancak işlemin ayrıca bir maliyet
            gerektirmesi halinde Kişisel Verileri Koruma Kurulu tarafından belirlenecek tarifeye göre tarafınızdan
            ücret
            talep edilebilecektir.
IX. Aydınlatma Metnindeki Değişiklik ve Güncellemeler
Bu Aydınlatma Metni’nde herhangi bir önemli değişiklik olması durumunda sizi bilgilendireceğiz.
            Aydınlatma Metni’nde önemli değişiklikler yapmaya karar verirsek, değişiklik yürürlüğe girmeden önce oyun içinde veya www.digitoygames.com adresinde bir bildirim yayınlayarak veya dosyamızda bulunan e-posta adresinize bir bildirim göndererek sizi ve diğer oyuncuları bilgilendireceğiz (ve kanunen gerekli olduğu durumlarda onayınızı isteyeceğiz). Bu süreci oyun bloglarına, sosyal ağ sayfalarına ve/veya oyuncu forumlarına bildirimler yayınlayarak destekleyebiliriz.
Güncellemeler için www.digitoygames.com adresini ve bu Aydınlatma Metni’ni periyodik olarak kontrol etmelisiniz.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/center:
Privacy Center home
Search
Privacy topics
More privacy resources
Privacy Policy
Other policies and articles
Settings
Privacy Center
Make the privacy choices that are right for you. Learn how to manage and control your privacy on Facebook, Instagram, Messenger, and other Meta Products.
We build privacy into our products
Privacy Checkup
Tools like Privacy Checkup make it easy for you to take control of your privacy.
Private messaging
Our messaging products offer end-to-end encryption so your conversations stay safe and secure.
Teen privacy
Our default settings on Facebook and Instagram help keep teens’ accounts private.
Ads education
We show different factors that contribute to why you saw an ad and give you options to see more ads you like.
Privacy topics
Get answers to your privacy questions and manage your privacy in a way that’s right for you.
Generative AI
AI at Meta
Safety
Manage what you share to feel safer using our products
Location
Learn how to manage your location
Teens
Access support and resources for teens
View all topics
Learn about Meta’s commitment to privacy
Find more resources you can use to learn about how Meta builds privacy into its products.
More privacy resources
Learn more in the Privacy Policy
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
Privacy Policy
Looking for more privacy settings?
Quickly access your settings across Facebook and Messenger or Instagram
Facebook
Instagram
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Sub-policy 1
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/en-ww/:
Choose another country or region to see content specific to your location and shop online.
Ireland
Ireland
Other country or region
Continue
Apple
Store
Shop the Latest
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
Accessories
Find a Store
Order Status
Apple Trade In
Financing
Personal Setup
Certified Refurbished
Education
Business
Veterans and Military
Government
Mac
Explore All Mac
MacBook Air
MacBook Pro
iMac
Mac mini
Mac Studio
Mac Pro
Displays
Compare Mac
Switch from PC to Mac
Shop Mac
Help Me Choose
Mac Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Mac Support
AppleCare+ for Mac
macOS Sequoia
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
Continuity
iCloud+
Mac for Business
Education
iPad
Explore All iPad
iPad Pro
iPad Air
iPad
iPad mini
Apple Pencil
Keyboards
Compare iPad
Why iPad
Shop iPad
iPad Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
iPad Support
AppleCare+ for iPad
iPadOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iCloud+
Education
iPhone
Explore All iPhone
iPhone 16 Pro
iPhone 16
iPhone 16e
iPhone 15
Compare iPhone
Switch from Android
Shop iPhone
iPhone Accessories
Apple Trade In
Carrier Deals at Apple
Financing
iPhone Support
AppleCare+ for iPhone
iOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iPhone Privacy
iCloud+
Wallet, Pay, Card
Siri
Watch
Explore All Apple Watch
Apple Watch Series 10
Apple Watch Ultra 2
Apple Watch SE
Apple Watch Nike
Apple Watch Hermès
Compare Watch
Why Apple Watch
Shop Apple Watch
Apple Watch Studio
Apple Watch Bands
Apple Watch Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Apple Watch Support
AppleCare+
watchOS 11
Apple Watch For Your Kids
Apps by Apple
Apple Fitness+
Vision
Explore Apple Vision Pro
Guided Tour
Tech Specs
Shop Apple Vision Pro
Apple Vision Pro Accessories
Book a Demo
Financing
Apple Vision Pro Support
AppleCare+
visionOS 2
AirPods
Explore All AirPods
AirPods 4
AirPods Pro 2
AirPods Max
Compare AirPods
Shop AirPods
AirPods Accessories
AirPods Support
AppleCare+ for Headphones
Hearing Health
Apple Music
TV & Home
Explore TV & Home
Apple TV 4K
HomePod
HomePod mini
Shop Apple TV 4K
Shop HomePod
Shop HomePod mini
Shop Siri Remote
TV & Home Accessories
Apple TV Support
HomePod Support
AppleCare+
Apple TV app
Apple TV+
Home app
Apple Music
Siri
AirPlay
Entertainment
Explore Entertainment
Apple One
Apple TV+
Apple Music
Apple Arcade
Apple Fitness+
Apple News+
Apple Podcasts
Apple Books
App Store
Apple TV+ Support
Apple Music Support
Accessories
Shop All Accessories
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
TV & Home
Made by Apple
Beats by Dr. Dre
AirTag
Support
iPhone
Mac
iPad
Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Music
TV
Explore Support
Community
Check Coverage
Repair
Get AppleCare+
Apple Account and Password
Billing & Subscriptions
Accessibility
5 total results
Find a Store
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Apple Intelligence
Apple Trade In
0
+
Privacy
Local Nav Open Menu
Local Nav Close Menu
Overview
Features
Control
Labels
Transparency Report
Privacy Policy
English
Choose your preferred language
At Apple, we believe strongly in fundamental privacy rights — and that those fundamental rights should not differ depending on where you live in the world.
That’s why we treat any data that relates to an identified or identifiable individual or that is linked or linkable to them by Apple as “personal data,” no matter where the individual lives.
This means that data that directly identifies you — such as your name — is personal data, and also data that does not directly identify you, but that can reasonably be used to identify you — such as the serial number of your device — is personal data. Aggregated data is considered non‑personal data for the purposes of this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy covers how
Apple or an Apple-affiliated company
(collectively, “Apple”) handles personal data whether you interact with us on our websites, through Apple apps (such as Apple Music or Wallet), or in person (including by phone or when visiting an Apple Store). Apple may also link to third parties on our services or make third-party apps available for download in our App Store. Apple’s Privacy Policy does not apply to how third parties define personal data or how they use it. We encourage you to read their privacy policies and know your privacy rights before interacting with them.
At Apple, we respect your ability to know, access, correct, transfer, restrict the processing of, and delete your personal data. We have provided these rights to our global customer base and if you choose to exercise these privacy rights, you have the right not to be treated in a discriminatory way nor to receive a lesser degree of service from Apple. Where you are requested to consent to the processing of your personal data by Apple, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
To exercise your privacy rights and choices, including where a third-party service provider is acting on Apple’s behalf, visit the Apple Data and Privacy page at
privacy.apple.com
for Apple or
shazam.com/privacy
for Shazam.
To help protect the security of your personal data, you must sign in to your account and your identity will be verified. If you want to obtain a copy of personal data that is not currently available from
privacy.apple.com
, you can make a request at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
. You also have the right to lodge a complaint with the applicable regulator.
There may be situations where we cannot grant your request — for example, if you ask us to delete your transaction data and Apple is legally obligated to keep a record of that transaction to comply with law. We may also decline to grant a request where doing so would undermine our legitimate use of data for anti-fraud and security purposes, such as when you request deletion of an account that is being investigated for security concerns. Other reasons your privacy request may be denied are if it jeopardizes the privacy of others, is frivolous or vexatious, or would be extremely impractical or unreasonable.
If you live in California and you cannot access Apple’s Data and Privacy page,
you or your authorized agent can make a request at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
or by calling 1-800-275-2273.
For more information on exercising your rights, visit
support.apple.com/102283
.
At Apple, we believe that you can have great products and great privacy. This means that we strive to
collect only the personal data that we need
. The personal data Apple collects depends on how you interact with Apple. Descriptions of how Apple handles personal data for certain individual services are available at
apple.com/legal/privacy/data
.
When you create an Apple Account, apply for commercial credit, purchase and/or activate a product or device, download a software update, register for a class at an Apple Store, connect to our services, contact us (including by social media), participate in an online survey, or otherwise interact with Apple, we may collect a variety of information, including:
Account Information.
Your Apple Account and related account details, including email address, devices registered, account status, and age
Device Information.
Data from which your device could be identified, such as device serial number, or about your device, such as browser type
Contact Information
. Data such as name, email address, physical address, phone number, or other contact information
Payment Information. Data about your billing address and method of payment, such as bank details, credit, debit, or other payment card information
Transaction Information.
Data about purchases of Apple products and services or transactions facilitated by Apple, including purchases on Apple platforms
Fraud Prevention Information.
Data used to help identify and prevent fraud, including a device trust score
Usage Data.
Data about your activity on and use of our offerings, such as app launches within our services, including browsing history; search history; product interaction; crash data, performance and other diagnostic data; and other usage data
Location Information
. Precise location only to support services such as Find My or where you agree for region-specific services, and coarse location
Health Information.
Data relating to the health status of an individual, including data related to one’s physical or mental health or condition. Personal health data also includes data that can be used to make inferences about or detect the health status of an individual. If you participate in a study using an Apple Health Research Study app, the policy governing the privacy of your personal data is described in the
Apple Health Study Apps Privacy Policy
.
Fitness Information.
Details relating to your fitness and exercise information where you choose to share them
Financial Information.
Details including salary, income, and assets information where collected, and information related to Apple-branded financial offerings
Government ID Data.
In certain jurisdictions, we may ask for a government-issued ID in limited circumstances, including when setting up a wireless account and activating your device, for the purpose of extending commercial credit, managing reservations, or as required by law
Other Information You Provide to Us.
Details such as the content of your communications with Apple, including interactions with customer support and contacts through social media channels
You are not required to provide the personal data that we have requested. However, if you choose not to do so, in many cases we will not be able to provide you with our products or services or respond to requests you may have.
Apple may receive personal data about you from other
individuals
, from businesses or third parties acting
at your direction
, from our
partners
who work with us to provide our products and services and assist us in security and fraud prevention, and from other
lawful sources.
Individuals.
Apple may collect data about you from other individuals — for example, if that individual has sent you a product or gift card, invited you to participate in an Apple service or forum, or shared content with you.
At Your Direction.
You may direct other individuals or third parties to share data with Apple. For example, you may direct your mobile carrier to share data about your carrier account with Apple for account activation, or for your loyalty program to share information about your participation so that you can earn rewards for Apple purchases.
Apple Partners.
We may also validate the information you provide — for example, when creating an Apple Account, with a third party for security, and for fraud-prevention purposes.
To power features such as search and as a source for our foundational AI models, Apple uses Applebot, a web crawler, to crawl information that is publicly available on the internet. We have measures in place to reduce the amount of personal data we collect and make no attempt to connect data crawled to any individual Apple user, or to build profiles about individuals. Your private personal data is not used to train our foundational AI models. To exercise your right as an individual to opt out of processing, visit the
Apple Intelligence Privacy Inquiries form
. For more information about Applebot, visit
support.apple.com/120320
.
For research and development purposes, we may use datasets such as those that contain images, voices, or other data that could be associated with an identifiable person. When acquiring such datasets, we do so in accordance with applicable law, including law in the jurisdiction in which the dataset is hosted. When using such datasets for research and development, we do not attempt to reidentify individuals who may appear therein.
Apple uses personal data to power our services, to process your transactions, to communicate with you, for security and fraud prevention, and to comply with law. We may also use personal data for other purposes with your consent.
Apple uses your personal data only when we have a valid legal basis to do so.
Depending on the circumstance, Apple may rely on your consent or the fact that the processing is necessary to fulfill a contract with you, protect your vital interests or those of other persons, or to comply with law. We may also process your personal data where we believe it is in our or others’ legitimate interests, taking into consideration your interests, rights, and expectations. More information is available in the product-specific information embedded in our products and features as described above. If you have questions about the legal basis, you can contact the Data Protection Officer at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
.
Power Our Services.
Apple collects personal data necessary to power our services, which may include personal data collected to improve our offerings, for internal purposes such as auditing or data analysis, or for troubleshooting. For example, if you would like to access a song through an Apple Music subscription, we collect data on what songs you play in order to provide you with the content requested and for royalty purposes.
Process Your Transactions.
To process transactions, Apple must collect data such as your name, purchase, and payment information.
Communicate with You.
To respond to communications, reach out to you about your transactions or account, market our products and services, provide other relevant information, or request information or feedback. From time to time, we may use your personal data to send important notices, such as communications about purchases and changes to our terms, conditions, and policies. Because this information is important to your interaction with Apple, you may not opt out of receiving these important notices.
Security and Fraud Prevention.
To protect individuals, employees, and Apple and for loss prevention and to prevent fraud, including to protect individuals, employees, and Apple for the benefit of all our users, and prescreening or scanning uploaded content for potentially illegal content, including child sexual exploitation material.
Personal Data Used for Personalization.
If you choose to personalize your services or communications where such options are available, Apple will use information that we collect so that we can offer you those personalized services or communications. You can learn more about how relevant services use information to personalize your experience by reviewing the privacy information presented when you first use a service that asks to use your personal data. We make this information easy to find by presenting it with our Data & Privacy icon; it’s also available at all times on your Apple device and online at
apple.com/legal/privacy/data
.
Comply with Law.
To comply with applicable law — for example, to satisfy tax or reporting obligations, or to comply with a lawful governmental request.
Apple does not use algorithms or profiling to make any decision that would significantly affect you without the opportunity for human review. Apple also does not use or disclose sensitive personal data for any purposes that would require a user to exercise a right to limit processing according to California law.
Apple retains personal data only for so long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which it was collected, including as described in this Privacy Policy or in our service-specific privacy notices, or as required by law. We will retain your personal data for the period necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in this Privacy Policy and our service-specific privacy notices. When assessing retention periods, we first carefully examine whether it is necessary to retain the personal data collected and, if retention is required, work to retain the personal data for the shortest possible period permissible under law.
Apple may share personal data with
Apple-affiliated companies
,
service providers
who act on our behalf, our
partners
,
developers, and publishers
, or others
at your direction
. Further, Apple does not share personal data with third parties for their own marketing purposes.
Service Providers.
Apple may engage third parties to act as our service providers and perform certain tasks on our behalf, such as processing or storing data, including personal data, in connection with your use of our services and delivering products to customers. Apple service providers are obligated to handle personal data consistent with this Privacy Policy and according to our instructions. They cannot use the personal data we share for their own purposes and must delete or return the personal data once they’ve fulfilled our request.
Partners.
At times, Apple may partner with third parties to provide services or other offerings. For example, Apple financial offerings like Apple Card and Apple Cash are offered by Apple and our partners. Apple requires its partners to protect your personal data.
Developers and Publishers from Whom You Get a Subscription.
If you purchase a third-party subscription from the App Store or within Apple News, we create a Subscriber ID that is unique to you and the developer or publisher. The Subscriber ID may be used to provide reports to the developer or publisher, which include information about the subscription you purchased and your country of residence. If you cancel all of your subscriptions from a particular developer or publisher, the Subscriber ID will reset after 180 days if you do not resubscribe. This information is provided to developers or publishers so that they can understand the performance of their subscriptions.
Others.
Apple may share personal data with others at your direction or with your consent, such as when we share information with your carrier to activate your account. We may also disclose information about you if we determine that for purposes of national security, law enforcement, or other issues of public importance, disclosure is necessary or appropriate. We may also disclose information about you where there is a lawful basis for doing so, if we determine that disclosure is reasonably necessary to enforce our terms and conditions or to protect our operations or users, or in the event of a reorganization, merger, or sale.
Apple does not sell your personal data including as “sale” is defined in Nevada and California. Apple also does not “share” your personal data as that term is defined in California.
At Apple, we believe that great privacy rests on great security. We use
administrative, technical, and physical safeguards
to protect your personal data, taking into account the nature of the personal data and the processing, and the threats posed. We are constantly working to improve on these safeguards to help keep your personal data secure. For more information, visit our
Apple Platform Security
guide.
Apple understands the importance of safeguarding the personal data of children, which we consider to be an
individual under the age of 13 or the equivalent age as specified by law in your jurisdiction
. That is why Apple has implemented additional processes and protections to help keep children’s personal data safe.
To access certain Apple services, a child must have a child Apple Account. A child Apple Account may be created by the
parent
or, in the case of a Managed Apple Account, by the
child’s educational institution
.
Parents.
To create a child account, parents must review the
Family Privacy Disclosure for Children
, which describes how Apple handles children’s personal data. If they agree, the parent must provide Apple with a verifiable parental consent.
Educational Institutions.
Educational institutions that participate in the Apple School Manager Program may also create Apple IDs for students, called “Managed Apple IDs.” These schools are required to agree to the
Managed Apple IDs for Students Disclosure
which is included as Exhibit A to the Apple School Manager Agreement.
If we learn that a child’s personal data was collected without appropriate authorization, it will be deleted as soon as possible.
To exercise privacy rights for your child’s information, visit the Apple Data and Privacy page at
privacy.apple.com
and sign in to their account.
Apple’s websites, online services, interactive applications, and advertisements may use
“cookies” and other technologies
such as web beacons.
These technologies help us to better understand user behavior including for security and fraud prevention purposes, tell us which parts of our websites people have visited, and facilitate and measure the effectiveness of advertisements and web searches.
Communications Cookies.
These cookies are used to enable network traffic to and from Apple’s systems, including by helping us detect any errors.
Strictly Necessary Cookies.
These cookies are set as required to provide a specific feature or service that you have accessed or requested. For example, they allow us to display our websites in the proper format and language, to authenticate and verify your transactions, and to preserve the contents of your Bag when shopping online at
apple.com
.
Other Cookies.
These cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with our websites and online services, including by helping us to assess the effectiveness of advertisements and web searches. Apple also uses these cookies to remember choices you make while browsing, so we can provide you with a customized experience.
If you prefer that Apple not use cookies, we provide you with the means to disable their use. If you want to disable cookies and you’re using the Safari web browser, choose “Block all cookies” in Safari’s privacy settings. If you are using a different browser, check with your provider to find out how to disable cookies. Certain features of the Apple website may not be available if all cookies are disabled.
In addition to cookies, Apple uses other technologies that help us achieve similar objectives.
In some email messages Apple sends to you, we provide a “click-through URL” that links you to content on the Apple website. When you click one of these URLs, they pass through a separate server before arriving at the destination page on our website. We track this click-through to help us determine interest in particular topics and measure whether we are communicating with you effectively. If you prefer not to be tracked in this way, you should not click graphic or text links in email messages.
Apple generally treats data we collect using these cookies and similar technologies as non-personal data.
However, to the extent that Internet Protocol (IP) addresses or similar identifiers are considered personal data by local law, we also treat these identifiers as personal data in those regions. In addition, Apple sometimes combines non-personal data collected from these technologies with other personal data Apple holds. When we combine data in this way, we treat the combined data as personal data for purposes of this Privacy Policy.
Ads that are delivered by Apple’s advertising platform may appear on the App Store, Apple News, Stocks, and Apple TV app depending on your location. Apple’s advertising platform does not track you, meaning that it does not link user or device data collected from our apps with user or device data collected from third parties for targeted advertising or advertising measurement purposes, and does not share user or device data with data brokers.
If you do not want to receive ads targeted to your interests from Apple's advertising platform in those apps, you can choose to disable Personalized Ads, which will opt your Apple Account out of receiving such ads regardless of what device you are using. On your iOS, iPadOS, or visionOS device, you can disable Personalized Ads by going to Settings > Privacy & Security > Apple Advertising and tapping to turn off Personalized Ads. On your Mac, you can disable Personalized Ads by going to System Settings > Privacy & Security > Privacy > Advertising, then deselecting Personalized Ads. You may still see ads in the App Store, Apple News, or Stocks based on context like your search query or the channel you are reading. If you disable Allow Apps to Request to Track, third-party apps cannot request to use the Advertising Identifier, a non-personal identifier served by the operating system on your device, to track you across apps and websites owned by other companies.
For more information about Apple-delivered advertising and privacy, visit
apple.com/legal/privacy/data/ww/apple-advertising
.
Apple products and offerings connect you to the world. To make that possible,
your personal data may be transferred to or accessed by entities around the world,
including Apple-affiliated companies, to perform processing activities such as those described in this Privacy Policy in connection with your use of our products and services. Apple complies with laws on the transfer of personal data between countries to help ensure your data is protected, wherever it may be.
The Apple entity that controls your personal data may differ depending on where you live.
For example, Apple Store information is controlled by individual retail entities in each country and Apple Media Services-related personal data may be controlled by various Apple entities as reflected in the terms of service. If you do not reside in the U.S., your personal data may be processed by Apple Inc. and other Apple-affiliated companies on behalf of the Apple entity controlling personal data for your jurisdiction. For example, Imagery and associated data collected by Apple around the world to improve Apple Maps and to support our Look Around feature is transferred to Apple Inc. in California.
Personal data relating to individuals in the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland is controlled by Apple Distribution International Limited in Ireland. Apple’s international transfer of personal data collected in the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland is governed by
Standard Contractual Clauses
. If you have questions or would like a copy of Apple’s Standard Contractual Clauses, you can contact us at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
.
Personal data collected by
Apple or an Apple-affiliated company
worldwide is generally stored by Apple Inc. in the United States. Regardless of where your personal data is stored, Apple maintains the same high level of protection and safeguarding measures.
Apple’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Global Cross-Border Privacy Rules (CBPRs) System and the Global Privacy Recognition for Processors (PRP) System. For more information about the Global CBPR and PRP Systems, visit
Global CBPR Forum
. To view our certifications, visit
CBPR System Compliance Directory
. For more information about the scope of our participation, or to submit a privacy inquiry through
BBB National Programs
, our Accountability Agent, visit:
Cross-Border Privacy Rules Program
Privacy Recognition for Processors Program
Personal data relating to individuals in the People’s Republic of China may be processed by Apple in countries outside of the People’s Republic of China, such as Apple Inc. in the United States or Apple Distribution International Limited in the Republic of Ireland. Where this occurs, it will be done in compliance with local laws, including the Personal Information Protection Law. For the purposes of processing set out in this Privacy Policy, Apple may also transfer such personal data to third-party service providers, who may in turn store or transfer the data outside of the People’s Republic of China. For more information, visit
China Mainland Privacy Disclosures
.
To make sure your personal data is secure, we communicate our privacy and security guidelines to Apple employees and strictly enforce privacy safeguards within the company.
If you have questions about Apple’s Privacy Policy or privacy practices including where a third-party service provider is acting on our behalf, or you would like to contact our Data Protection Officer, you can contact us at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
or call the
Apple Support number
for your country or region.
You can also ask us questions about how to submit a privacy complaint and we will endeavor to help.
Apple takes your privacy questions seriously. A dedicated team reviews your inquiry to determine how best to respond to your question or concern, including those inquiries received in response to an access or download request. In most cases, all substantive contacts receive a response within seven days. In other cases, we may require additional information or let you know that we need more time to respond.
Where your complaint indicates an improvement could be made in our handling of privacy issues, we will take steps to make such an update at the next reasonable opportunity. In the event that a privacy issue has resulted in a negative impact on you or another person, we will take steps to address that with you or that other person.
You may at any time — including if you are not satisfied with Apple’s response — refer your complaint to the applicable regulator. If you ask us, we will endeavor to provide you with information about relevant complaint avenues which may be applicable to your circumstances.
When there is a material change to this Privacy Policy, we’ll post a notice on this website at least a week in advance of doing so and contact you directly about the change if we have your data on file.
View our CBPR certification
View our PRP certification
Sub-policy 2
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en-US:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 3
https://aws.amazon.com/tr/privacy/:
Çerez tercihlerinizi seçme
Sitemizi ve hizmetlerimizi sunmak için gerekli olan temel çerezleri ve benzer araçları kullanırız. Müşterilerin sitemizi nasıl kullandığını anlamamıza ve iyileştirmeler yapmamıza yardımcı olan anonim istatistikler toplamak üzere performans çerezlerini kullanırız. Temel çerezler devre dışı bırakılamaz ancak performans çerezlerini reddetmek için \"Özelleştir\" veya \"Reddet\" seçeneğine tıklayabilirsiniz.
Kabul ettiğiniz takdirde AWS ve onaylı üçüncü taraflar; yararlı site özellikleri sağlamak, tercihlerinizi hatırlamak ve alakalı reklamlar dahil olmak üzere alakalı içerikler göstermek amacıyla da çerez kullanacaktır. Temel olmayan tüm çerezleri kabul etmek veya reddetmek için \"Kabul et\" veya \"Reddet\" seçeneğine tıklayın. Daha ayrıntılı seçimler yapmak için \"Özelleştir\" seçeneğine tıklayın.
Kabul et
Reddet
Özelleştir
Çerezleri ve benzer araçları (topluca "çerezler") aşağıdaki amaçlar için kullanırız.
Temel
Temel çerezler, sitemizi ve hizmetlerimizi sunmak için gerekli olup devre dışı bırakılamaz. Bunlar genellikle sitede gizlilik tercihlerinizi ayarlama, oturum açma veya formları doldurma gibi eylemlerde bulunduğunuzda yerleştirilir.
Performans
Performans çerezleri, site deneyimini ve performansını iyileştirebilmemiz için müşterilerin sitemizde nasıl gezindiği hakkında anonim istatistikler sağlar. Onaylı üçüncü taraflar bizim adımıza analiz yapabilir ancak verileri kendi amaçları için kullanamazlar.
Performans kategorisine izin ver
İzin verildi
İşlevsellik
İşlevsellik çerezleri yararlı site özellikleri sunmamıza, tercihlerinizi hatırlamamıza ve alakalı içerikler göstermemize yardımcı olur. Onaylı üçüncü taraflar bu çerezleri belirli site özelliklerini sağlamak için yerleştirebilir. Bu çerezlere izin vermezseniz, bu hizmetlerin bir kısmı veya tamamı düzgün çalışmayabilir.
İşlevsellik kategorisine izin ver
İzin verildi
Reklam
Reklam çerezleri, sitemiz aracılığıyla bizim tarafımızdan ya da reklam çözüm ortaklarımız tarafından yerleştirilebilir ve alakalı pazarlama içerikleri yayınlamamıza yardımcı olur. Bu çerezlere izin vermezseniz, daha az alakalı reklamlarla karşılaşırsınız.
Reklam kategorisine izin ver
İzin verildi
Bazı çerez türlerini engellemek, sitelerimizle ilgili deneyiminizi etkileyebilir. Bu sitenin alt bilgisindeki Çerez tercihleri bağlantısına tıklayarak dilediğiniz zaman seçimlerinizi değiştirebilirsiniz. Bizim ve onaylı üçüncü tarafların, çerezleri sitelerimizde nasıl kullandığımız hakkında daha fazla bilgi edinmek için lütfen
AWS Çerez Bildirimimizi
okuyun.
Bağlamlar arası davranışsal reklamcılık dahil olmak üzere AWS sitelerinde ve diğer özelliklerde ilgi alanlarınızla alakalı reklamlar gösteririz. Bağlamlar arası davranışsal reklamcılık, bir site veya uygulamanın verilerini, farklı bir şirket sitesinde ya da uygulamasında size reklam göstermek için kullanır.
Çerezlere veya benzer teknolojilere dayalı AWS bağlamlar arası davranışsal reklamcılığa izin vermemek için aşağıdaki \"İzin verme\" ve \"Gizlilik seçimlerini kaydet\" seçeneklerine tıklayın veya Genel Gizlilik Denetimi gibi yasal olarak tanınan izin vermeme sinyali etkinleştirilmiş bir AWS sitesini ziyaret edin. Çerezlerinizi silerseniz veya bu siteyi farklı bir tarayıcı kullanarak ziyaret ederseniz bu seçimi yeniden yapmanız gerekir. Çerezler ve bunları nasıl kullandığımız hakkında daha fazla bilgi edinmek için lütfen
AWS Çerez Bildirimimizi
okuyun.
Bağlamlar arası davranışsal reklamlar
İzin ver
İzin verme
AWS'nin diğer tüm bağlamlar arası davranışsal reklamlarına izin vermemek için
bu formu e-postayla doldurun
.
AWS'nin bilgilerinizi nasıl işlediği hakkında daha fazla bilgi edinmek için lütfen
AWS Gizlilik Bildirimi
'ni okuyun.
Çerez tercihlerinizi kaydedemediğimizden şimdilik yalnızca temel çerezleri saklayacağız.
Çerez tercihlerinizi değiştirmek istiyorsanız AWS konsolu alt bilgisindeki bağlantıyı kullanarak daha sonra tekrar deneyin veya sorunun devam etmesi durumunda destek ekibiyle iletişime geçin.
Ana İçeriğe Atla
Amazon Web Services
Legal

Gizlilik Bildirimi
Get Started for Free
Create Free Account
Gizlilik Bildirimi
Aşağıdaki çeviri, yalnız bilgilendirme amacıyla sağlanmıştır. Bu çeviri ve İngilizce sürüm arasında uyuşmazlık, tutarsızlık veya çelişki halinde (özellikle çeviri gecikmeleri nedeniyle) İngilizce sürüm geçerli olacaktır.
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Malaysia
Deutsch
Español
Français
Italiano
Polish
Português
Ρусский
Türkçe
日本語
한국어
中文 (简体)
Internet Explorer için AWS'nin sunduğu destek 07/31/2022 tarihinde sona eriyor. Desteklenen tarayıcılar: Chrome, Firefox, Edge ve Safari.
Daha fazla bilgi edinin »